District of Columbia statutes.
2-351.03

Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty within this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement. For purposes of this chapter, the term “good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 103, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-351.03.
This section is referenced in § 2-351.05.